Utah statutes.
63G-6a-608.   Tie bids -- Resolution -- Copies provided to attorney general.

(1)  A procurement officer shall resolve a tie bid in accordance with a method established by rule made by the applicable rulemaking authority.  The method may include awarding the tie bid:

(a)  to the tie bidder who:

(i)  is a provider of state products, if no other tie bidder is a responsive provider of state products;

(ii)  is closest to the point of delivery;

(iii)  received the previous award; or

(iv)  will provide the earliest delivery date;

(b)  by drawing lots; or

(c)  by any other reasonable method of resolving a tie bid.

(2)  The method chosen by the procurement officer to resolve a tie bid shall be at the sole discretion of the procurement officer, subject to the rules established under Subsection (1).

(3)  A procurement unit in the state executive branch shall provide a copy of the procurement to the attorney general if an award of a contract to a tie bidder exceeds $100,000 in expenditures.



Amended by Chapter 445, 2013 General Session

